Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-8] Design claim conciliation panel
hearing; persons attending. Unless excluded or excused by the panel, the
following persons shall attend hearings before the panel:

(1) The party or parties making the claim;

(2) The design professional against whom the claim is
made or representatives thereof, other than counsel, authorized to act for the design
professional; or

(3) Counsel for the parties, if any. [L 2007, c 207,
pt of §2]

Revision Note

In paragraph (2), the semicolon after "thereof"
changed to a comma pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next